Nebraska, session 109, LB507.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB507 LB507
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1129, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1129 (1) The school board of the resident school district shall
provide one of the following types of services to children with
disabilities:
(a) Provide for the transportation expenses for children with
disabilities who are forced to leave the school district temporarily
because of lack of educational services. A parent or guardian
transporting such a child shall be paid for each day of attendance at the
mileage rate provided in section 81-1176 for each actual mile or fraction
thereof traveled between the place of residence and the program of
attendance, and when any parent or guardian transports more than one
child with a disability in his or her custody or control enrolled in
programs at the same location, the amount of payments to such parent or
guardian shall be based upon the transportation of one such child. No
transportation payments shall be made to a parent or guardian for mileage
not actually traveled by such parent or guardian;
(b) Provide for the transportation expenses within the school
district of any child with a disability enrolled in the school district
who is enrolled in a special educational program of the district when
either (i) the child is required to attend a facility other than what
would be the normal school or attendance facility of the child to receive
appropriate special educational services or (ii) the nature of the
child's disability is such that special transportation is required. A
parent or guardian transporting such child shall be paid for each day of
attendance at the mileage rate provided in section 81-1176 for each
actual mile or fraction thereof traveled between the place of residence
and the program of attendance, and when any parent or guardian transports
more than one child with a disability in his or her custody or control
enrolled in programs at the same location, the amount of payments to such
parent or guardian shall be based upon the transportation of one such
-2-

LB507 LB507
2025 2025
child. No transportation payments shall be made to a parent or guardian
for mileage not actually traveled by such parent or guardian;
(c) Provide visiting teachers for homebound children with
disabilities. Such teachers shall be certified and qualified in the same
manner as required for other teachers in Nebraska;
(d) Provide correspondence instruction approved by the Commissioner
of Education; or
(e) Provide any other method of instruction approved by the
Commissioner of Education.
(2) When a child with a disability resides in or attends a preschool
or child care program in a school district other than the school district
of residence of his or her parents or guardian, the nonresident school
district may, upon mutual agreement with the school district of
residence, provide for the transportation expenses of the child.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-1129, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-